Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-29,102
Governing law.

(1) The laws of the state or other jurisdiction under which a foreign limited cooperative association is organized govern relations among the members of the foreign limited cooperative association and between the members and the foreign limited cooperative association.

(2) A foreign limited cooperative association shall not be denied a certificate of authority by reason of any difference between the laws of the jurisdiction under which the foreign limited cooperative association is organized and the laws of this state.

(3) A certificate of authority does not authorize a foreign limited cooperative association to engage in any activity or exercise any power that a limited cooperative association cannot engage in or exercise in this state.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 102.